Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 1 General Provisions

Cross references. —

As to limitation of actions with reference to real estate, see §§

1-3-101

,

1-3-103

,

1-3-104

.

As to conveyance of real property by master commissioner in connection with enforcement of judgment lien by execution, see §

1-17-322

.

As to information to be shown in deed, and as to form of deed with reference to real property sold under mortgage or execution, see §

1-18-109

et seq.

As to requirement that agreements for sale of real estate be in writing (statute of frauds), see §

1-23-105

.

For authority of sheriff to execute conveyance in connection with partition of real estate, see §§

1-32-110

,

1-32-113

,

1-32-116

.

As to sale or lease of certain interest in real property, see §§

1-32-301

to

1-32-311

.

As to specific performance and as to actions for purchase money in connection with real property, see §§

1-32-401

to

1-32-405

.

As to action for construction of deed (Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act) generally, see §§

1-37-101

to

1-37-115

.

As to specific performance and conveyance of real estate in connection with executors and administrators generally, see §§

2-7-601

to

2-7-608

.

As to execution of deeds by religious societies, see §

17-8-114

.

As to ownership of property by a partnership, see §

17-21-203

.

As to fees for recording deeds, etc., with county clerk, see §

18-3-402

.

As to power of married women to convey, etc., property and to contract, see §

20-1-202

.

As to title insurance, see §§

26-23-301

to

26-23-336

.

As to recording mine claims with county clerk, and as to requisites of certificates, see §

30-1-101

.

As to real estate brokers and salesmen, see §§

33-28-101

to

33-28-124

.

As to conveyance of cemetery lots and as to recording same in office of county clerk, see §

35-8-102

.

As to exchange of state-owned and privately owned lands, see §

36-1-107

.

For authority of board of land commissioners to take such action as may be necessary in securing title to land grants, etc., see §

36-2-101

.

As to execution of deed by sheriff in connection with lands sold or liens on water rights under Carey Act, see §

36-7-507

.

As to sale of state lands generally, see §§

36-9-101

to

36-9-120

.

As to authority of railroads to sell, lease, etc., to other railroads outside of state, etc., see §

37-9-106

.

As to payment of taxes as between grantor and grantee, see §

39-13-103

.

For rule of civil procedure where judgment directs a party to execute a conveyance of land or to deliver deeds or other documents or to perform any other specific act and the party fails to comply within the time specified, see Rule 70, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

9B Am. Jur. 2d Bankruptcy §§ 1824 to 1826; 77 Am. Jur. 2d Vendor and Purchaser § 1 et seq.

Validity, construction and application of provisions entitling mortgagee to increase interest rate on transfer of mortgaged property, 92 ALR3d 822.

Power to appoint realty in fee or personalty absolutely as including power to appoint lesser estate or interest, 94 ALR3d 895.

Construction and effect of clause in real-estate contract making contract contingent upon approval by attorney for either party, 15 ALR4th 760.

Liability to real-property purchaser for negligent appraisal of property's value, 21 ALR4th 867.

Mortgagee-lender's duty, in disbursing funds, to protect mortgagor against outstanding or potential mechanics' liens against the mortgaged property, 30 ALR4th 134.

Right of mortgagee and/or lienor to compensation when property subject to mortgage and/or lien is taken by federal governmental forfeiture based on criminal acts of owner, 136 ALR Fed 593.

92 C.J.S. Vendor and Purchaser § 1 et seq.